Hawaii statutes.
[§211D-10] Reports; audits. (a) The
department shall submit to the legislature an annual status report on the
program's activities.

(b) The financial transactions of the fund are
subject to audit by the auditor. [L 2000, c 290, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next